Utah statutes.
57-3-104.   Certified copies entitled to record in another county -- Effect.
(1) (a)  A document of record in a county recorder's office that is certified
by the county recorder may be recorded in the office of the county recorder of
another county.
(b)  The recording of a certified copy in the office of the county recorder of
another county has the same force and effect as if the original document had
been recorded in the other county.
(2)  A certified copy of a document may not be submitted for recording under
Subsection (1) in the office of the same county recorder that issued the
certified copy.
